Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4421.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 246.54, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Exceptions. new text begin (a)new text end Regardless of the facility to which the client is committed, subdivisions 1, 1a, 1b, and 1c, do not apply to the following individuals: (1) clients who are committed as sexual psychopathic personalities under section 253D.02, subdivision 15; and (2) clients who are committed as sexually dangerous persons under section 253D.02, subdivision 16. new text begin (b) A county that is classified as economically distressed is not responsible for the costs of care under this section. The executive board must classify a county as economically distressed if: new text end new text begin (1) more than 15 percent of the county's population is living in poverty, according to the most recent data published by the United States Census Bureau; and new text end new text begin (2) more than 70 percent of the total acreage in the county is exempt from property taxation under chapter 272. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 254B.03, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Division of costs. (a) Except for services provided by a county under section 254B.09, subdivision 1, or services provided under section 256B.69, the county shall, out of local money, pay the state for 22.95 percent of the cost of substance use disorder services, except for those services provided to persons enrolled in medical assistance under chapter 256B and room and board services under section 254B.0505, subdivision 1. Counties may use the indigent hospitalization levy for treatment and hospital payments made under this section. (b) 22.95 percent of any state collections from private or third-party pay, less 15 percent for the cost of payment and collections, must be distributed to the county that paid for a portion of the treatment under this section. new text begin (c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b), a county that is classified as economically distressed is not responsible for the county share of the cost of substance use disorder services. The commissioner must classify a county as economically distressed if: new text end new text begin (1) more than 15 percent of the county's population is living in poverty, according to the most recent data published by the United States Census Bureau; and new text end new text begin (2) more than 70 percent of the total acreage in the county is exempt from property taxation under chapter 272. new text end